Hawaii statutes.
§454F-1.8 Sponsorship by mortgage loan
originator company, exempt sponsoring mortgage loan originator company, or
nonprofit organization. All mortgage loan originators shall be sponsored
by a mortgage loan originator company, an exempt sponsoring mortgage loan
originator company, or a nonprofit organization. At no time shall a mortgage
loan originator be sponsored by more than one Hawaii licensed mortgage loan
originator company, exempt sponsoring mortgage loan originator company, or
nonprofit organization. [L 2011, c 194, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 252, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next